Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Anhydrous Ammonia

250.482.
Definitions for KRS 250.483 to 250.488.

As used in KRS

250.483

to

250.488

:

“Department” means the Department of Insurance;

“Division” means the Division of Fire Prevention in the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.

“Anhydrous ammonia” refers to the compound formed by the combination of the two (2) gaseous elements, nitrogen and hydrogen, in the proportion of one (1) part nitrogen to three (3) parts of hydrogen by volume. Anhydrous ammonia is ammonia gas in compressed or liquefied form, and is not aqueous ammonia.

“Approved container” means a container for anhydrous ammonia which meets or exceeds the requirements of the Federal law or regulation for the storage and handling of anhydrous ammonia.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 62, § 1; 1976, ch. 299, § 54; 1980, ch. 188, § 235, effective July 15, 1980; 2000, ch. 233, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 602, effective July 15, 2010.

250.483.
Administrative regulations governing anhydrous ammonia.

The Division of Fire Prevention in the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction shall make, promulgate, and enforce administrative regulations setting forth minimum general standards covering the design, construction, location, installation, and operation of equipment for storing, handling, transporting by tank truck, tank trailer, and utilizing anhydrous ammonia. The administrative regulations shall be such as are reasonably necessary for the protection and safety of the public and persons using such materials, and shall be in substantial conformity with the generally-accepted standards of safety concerning the same subject matter. Administrative regulations in substantial conformity with the published standards of the Fertilizer Institute and the Compressed Gas Association for the design, installation, and construction of containers and equipment for the storage and handling of anhydrous ammonia shall be deemed to be in substantial conformity with the generally-accepted standards of safety concerning the same subject matter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 62, § 2; 1976, ch. 299, § 55; 2000, ch. 233, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 603, effective July 15, 2010.

250.484.
Installation and maintenance of equipment.

All equipment shall be installed and maintained in a safe operating condition and in conformity with the rules and regulations of the division adopted under KRS

250.483

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 62, § 3; 1976, ch. 299, § 56.

250.486.
Restrictions on handling anhydrous ammonia — Registration.

No person, firm, or corporation other than the owner of the facility and those authorized by the owner so to do, shall sell, fill, refill, deliver or permit to be delivered, or use in any manner any anhydrous ammonia container or receptacle for any gas, compound, for any other purpose whatsoever. Any wholesaler, dealer, or handler of anhydrous ammonia or pressure liquid fertilizers that have a vapor pressure in excess of fifty (50) pounds at one hundred (100) degrees Fahrenheit shall be registered with the division.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 62, § 4; 1960, ch. 55, § 1; 1976, ch. 299, § 57; 2000, ch. 233, § 3, effective July 14, 2000.

250.487.
Disposition of license fees. [Repealed.]

250.488.
Order to correct violation — Injunctive remedies. [Repealed.]

250.489.
Possession of anhydrous ammonia in unapproved container prohibited — Exceptions — Affirmative defense.

It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly possess anhydrous ammonia in any container other than an approved container.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to trained chemists working in properly equipped research laboratories in education, government, or corporate settings.

It shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution under this section that the anhydrous ammonia is possessed for the sole purpose of agricultural use.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 233, § 4, effective July 14, 2000.

250.4892.
Tampering with anhydrous ammonia equipment prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person to tamper with equipment, containers, or facilities used for the storage, handling, transporting, or application of anhydrous ammonia.

Tampering occurs when any person who, having no right to do so, or any reasonable ground to believe that he has the right for a legitimate or legal purpose, transfers or attempts to transfer anhydrous ammonia to another container, or intentionally or wantonly defaces, destroys, or damages the equipment, container, or facility containing anhydrous ammonia.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 233, § 5, effective July 14, 2000.

250.4894.
No cause of action for damages incurred while tampering with anhydrous ammonia equipment.

Any person tampering with anhydrous ammonia equipment, containers or storage facilities in violation of KRS

250.4892

shall not have a cause of action against the owner of the equipment, container, or facility; any person responsible for the installation, maintenance, or operation of the equipment, container or facility; any person lawfully selling anhydrous ammonia; or any person lawfully purchasing anhydrous ammonia for agricultural purposes for damages arising out of the tampering.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 233, § 6, effective July 14, 2000.